en: 2014 Gold medal of the German Agricultural Society
ca: Medalla d'or de la Societat Agrícola Alemanya 2014
de: DLG Goldener Preis 2014
es: 2014 Medalla de oro de la Sociedad Agrícola Alemana
fi: Saksan maatalousyhdistyksen kultamitali 2014
fr: Médaille d'or 2014 de la Société Allemande d'Agriculture
hr: Zlatna medalja Njemačkog poljoprivrednog društva 2014
it: Medaglia d'oro della Società Agricola Tedesca nel 2014
pt: Medalha de ouro da Sociedade Agrícola Alemã de 2014

en: 2015 Gold medal of the German Agricultural Society
ca: Medalla d'or de la Societat Agrícola Alemanya 2015
de: DLG Goldener Preis 2015
es: 2015 Medalla de oro de la Sociedad Agrícola Alemana
fi: Saksan maatalousyhdistyksen kultamitali 2015
fr: Médaille d'or 2015 de la Société Allemande d'Agriculture
hr: Zlatna medalja Njemačkog poljoprivrednog društva 2015
it: Medaglia d'oro della Società Agricola Tedesca nel 2015
pt: Medalha de ouro da Sociedade Agrícola Alemã de 2015

en: 2016 Gold medal of the German Agricultural Society
ca: Medalla d'or de la Societat Agrícola Alemanya 2016
de: DLG Goldener Preis 2016
fi: Saksan maatalousyhdistyksen kultamitali 2016
fr: Médaille d'or 2016 de la Société Allemande d'Agriculture
hr: Zlatna medalja Njemačkog poljoprivrednog društva 2016
it: Medaglia d'oro della Società Agricola Tedesca nel 2016
pt: Medalha de ouro da Sociedade Agrícola Alemã de 2016

en: 2017 Gold medal of the German Agricultural Society
ca: Medalla d'or de la Societat Agrícola Alemanya 2017
cs: Zlatá medaile r. 2017 Německé Zemědělské Společnosti / DLG
de: DLG Goldener Preis 2017
fi: Saksan maatalousyhdistyksen kultamitali 2017
fr: Médaille d'or 2017 de la Société Allemande d'Agriculture
hr: Zlatna medalja Njemačkog poljoprivrednog društva 2017
it: Medaglia d'oro della Società Agricola Tedesca nel 2017
pt: Medalha de ouro da Sociedade Agrícola Alemã de 2017

en: 2018 Gold medal of the German Agricultural Society
ca: Medalla d'or de la Societat Agrícola Alemanya 2018
cs: Zlatá medaile r. 2018 Německé Zemědělské Společnosti / DLG
de: DLG Goldener Preis 2018
fi: Saksan maatalousyhdistyksen kultamitali 2018
fr: Médaille d'or 2018 de la Société Allemande d'Agriculture
hr: Zlatna medalja Njemačkog poljoprivrednog društva 2018
it: Medaglia d'oro della Società Agricola Tedesca nel 2018
pt: Medalha de ouro da Sociedade Agrícola Alemã de 2018

en: 2019 Gold medal of the German Agricultural Society
cs: Zlatá medaile r. 2019 Německé Zemědělské Společnosti / DLG
de: DLG Goldener Preis 2019
fi: Saksan maatalousyhdistyksen kultamitali 2019
fr: Médaille d'or 2019 de la Société Allemande d'Agriculture
hr: Zlatna medalja Njemačkog poljoprivrednog društva 2019
it: Medaglia d'oro della Società Agricola Tedesca nel 2019
pt: Medalha de ouro da Sociedade Agrícola Alemã de 2019

en: 2020 Gold medal of the German Agricultural Society
de: DLG Goldener Preis 2020
fi: Saksan maatalousyhdistyksen kultamitali 2020
fr: Médaille d'or 2020 de la Société Allemande d'Agriculture
hr: Zlatna medalja Njemačkog poljoprivrednog društva 2020
it: Medaglia d'oro 2020 della Società agricola tedesca
pt: Medalha de ouro da Sociedade Agrícola Alemã de 2020

en: 2021 Gold medal of the German Agricultural Society
de: DLG Goldener Preis 2021
fi: Saksan maatalousyhdistyksen kultamitali 2021
fr: Médaille d'or 2021 de la Société Allemande d'Agriculture
hr: Zlatna medalja Njemačkog poljoprivrednog društva 2021
pt: Medalha de ouro da Sociedade Agrícola Alemã de 2021

en: 2022 Gold medal of the German Agricultural Society
de: DLG Goldener Preis 2022
fi: Saksan maatalousyhdistyksen kultamitali 2022
fr: Médaille d'or 2022 de la Société Allemande d'Agriculture
hr: Zlatna medalja Njemačkog poljoprivrednog društva 2022
pt: Medalha de ouro da Sociedade Agrícola Alemã de 2022

en: 2023 Gold medal of the German Agricultural Society
de: DLG Goldener Preis 2023
fi: Saksan maatalousyhdistyksen kultamitali 2023
fr: Médaille d'or 2023 de la Société Allemande d'Agriculture
hr: Zlatna medalja Njemačkog poljoprivrednog društva 2023
pt: Medalha de ouro da Sociedade Agrícola Alemã de 2023

en: 2024 Gold medal of the German Agricultural Society
de: DLG Goldener Preis 2024

en: 2025 Gold medal of the German Agricultural Society
de: DLG Goldener Preis 2025

en: Winner of the "consumer rights and quality of service" (Russia)
fi: Kuluttajien oikeuksien ja palvelun laadun voittaja (Venäjä)
fr: Gagnant des droits des consommateurs et de la qualité du service (Russie)
ru: Лауреат премии «Права потребителей и качество обслуживания»

ru: Лауреат премии «Права потребителей и качество обслуживания» 2014
fi: Kuluttajien oikeuksien ja palvelun laadun voittaja 2014 (Venäjä)
fr: Gagnant des droits des consommateurs et de la qualité du service 2014 (Russie)

en: One hundred best goods of Russia
fi: sata parasta venäjän tuotetta
fr: Cent meilleurs produits de Russie
nl: Honderd beste Russische producten
ru: Сто лучших товаров России

en: One hundred best goods of Russia 2012
fi: sata parasta venäjän tuotetta 2012
fr: Cent meilleurs produits de Russie 2012
nl: Honderd beste Russische producten 2012
ru: Сто лучших товаров России 2012

en: One hundred best goods of Russia 2013
fi: sata parasta venäjän tuotetta 2013
fr: Cent meilleurs produits de Russie 2013
nl: Honderd beste Russische producten 2013
ru: Сто лучших товаров России 2013

en: One hundred best goods of Russia 2015
fi: sata parasta venäjän tuotetta 2015
fr: Cent meilleurs produits de Russie 2015
nl: Honderd beste Russische producten 2015
ru: Сто лучших товаров России 2015

en: Swiss AOC, CH AOC, AOC CH
fr: AOC Suisse, AOC CH, CH AOC

en: Swiss PGI, CH PGI, PGI CH
fr: IGP Suisse, IGP CH, CH IGP